Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
50-437
Nebraska Legislative
Shared Information System Cash Fund; created; investment.

There is hereby created the Nebraska Legislative Shared Information
System Cash Fund, which fund shall consist of fees received from services
provided by the Legislature. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Nebraska Legislative Shared Information
System Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 54;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 27.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.